New York, session 2025-2026, A1665.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 904-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 904-a. Heimlich maneuver. 1. No later than one hundred eighty days 4 after the effective date of this section, school districts, boards of 5 cooperative educational services, county vocational education and exten- 6 sion boards and charter schools shall require at least one staff member 7 in every school building, facility or annex to: 8 a. be trained in the administration of the Heimlich maneuver; and 9 b. have one such person trained in the administration of the Heimlich 10 maneuver be present in the same room while students eat meals, includ- 11 ing, but not limited to lunchrooms, multipurpose rooms, auditoriums and 12 outdoor eating facilities. 13 2. The commissioner is authorized to promulgate regulations for the 14 implementation of this section. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04078-01-5